District of Columbia statutes.
7-861

Repealed

Program establishment.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-172, § 2, 43 DCR 4491
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 33, 53 DCR 6794
1981 Ed., § 6-331.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Temporary Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-199, March 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1516).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-132, May 29, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 3360).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-320, August 4, 1994, 41 DCR 5369), §§ 2 and 3 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-329, October 21, 1994, 41 DCR 7160), §§ 2 and 3 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-1, January 18, 1995, 42 DCR 537), §§ 2 and 3 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-188, January 25, 1996, 43 DCR 395), §§ 2 and 3 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-245, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2121), and §§ 2 and 3 of the Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-484, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 628).
For temporary (90 day) addition of subchapter, see §§ 502 to 504 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 11-172, the “Early Intervention Services Sliding Fee Scale Establishment Act of 1996”, see Mayor’s Order 97-110, June 18, 1997 ( 44 DCR 4128).
Delegation of Rulemaking Authority to the Director of the Child and Family Services Agency under the Newborn Safe Haven Temporary Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2009-146, September 1, 2009 ( 56 DCR 7517).